District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.31

Housing linkage objective.

The housing linkage objective is to require applicants who obtain bonus commercial office space as a result of a discretionary and otherwise appropriate street or alley closing or zoning density increase to produce housing or contribute funds to the production of housing, particularly housing that is affordable to low- and moderate-income households throughout the District, in an amount based on a formula tied to the amount or value of the additional commercial office square footage obtained.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1497

History